Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 18 Sale and Redemption of Realty Sold Under Mortgage or Execution

Cross references. —

As to venue in action for sale of real property under mortgage, lien or other encumbrance, see §

1-5-101

.

As to other actions involving realty, see chapter 32 of this title.

As to deeds, mortgages and leases generally, see §§

34-2-101

to

34-2-130

.

As to deeds of trust and sales thereunder, see §§

34-3-101

to

34-3-104

.

As to foreclosure of mortgages and power of sale, see §§

34-4-101

to

34-4-113

.

As to foreclosure of lien on property in connection with water rights under the Carey Act, see §§

36-7-503

to

36-7-508

.

As to sale and redemption of real estate for taxes, see §§

39-13-108

and

39-13-109

.

Remedy of mortgagee. —

A mortgagee's only remedy upon mortgage default is foreclosure and public sale, either by power of sale pursuant to §

34-4-101

et seq., or by judicial sale in accordance with this article. Sannerud v. Brantz, 928 P.2d 477,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 456 to 603; 55 Am. Jur. 2d Mortgages §§ 512 to 1117.

Validity and enforceability of due-on-sale real-estate mortgage provisions, 61 ALR4th 1070.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 211 to 276; 59 C.J.S. Mortgages §§ 490 to 558.

§ 1-18-101.
Sale to
be at public vendue; hours of sale; notice required; mortgagee, judgment
creditor or lienor must be present or waive; penalty.

No lands or tenements shall be sold by virtue of any execution or decree of foreclosure unless:

The sale is by public vendue between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. of the same day;

The time and place of holding the sale was previously advertised for four (4) consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county where the lands and tenements are situate; and

The foreclosing mortgagee, judgment creditor, other foreclosing lienor or an authorized agent of the foreclosing party is present at the sale or has previously waived to the sheriff conducting the sale the right to appear and bid at the sale. The sheriff conducting the sale shall not be considered to be the authorized agent of the foreclosing party unless the foreclosing party has given the sheriff a specified opening bid to be presented by the sheriff on behalf of the foreclosing party and the sheriff actually presents the opening bid. Any foreclosure sale conducted without complying with the terms of this section is void, in which case the mortgage, power of sale, judgment or other lien which is the subject of the voided sale is not extinguished or exhausted, but may be properly foreclosed in a subsequent foreclosure sale in compliance with applicable law.

The notice shall state the names of the plaintiff and defendant in the action, and the time and place of sale. In all notices the lands or tenements to be sold shall be described with reasonable certainty by appropriate description. The notice shall state “The property being foreclosed upon may be subject to other liens and encumbrances that will not be extinguished at the sale and any prospective purchaser should research the status of title before submitting a bid.” If any officer sells any lands or tenements by virtue of any execution or decree, otherwise than as provided, the officer so offending shall forfeit and pay five hundred dollars ($500.00) for every offense, to be recovered with costs in any court of record in this state by the person whose lands were advertised and sold.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3879; C.S. 1910, § 4733; C.S. 1920, § 6006; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 97; R.S. 1931, § 89-2965; C.S. 1945, § 3-4301; W.S. 1957, § 1-478; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 7, § 1; 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after that date, added subsection and paragraph designations; in (a)(ii) substituted “a legal newspaper of general circulation” for “the county newspaper”; inserted (a)(iii); in (b) inserted the third sentence and substituted “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)”; and made related changes.

Construed in pari materia. —

Sections

1-6-201

and

1-6-203

, being later enactment than this section, not only supplement but also control interpretation of provisions of this section. Home Owners' Loan Corp. v. Diefenderfer, 57 Wyo. 13, 112 P.2d 563,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1941).

Statute provides protection. —

Wyoming tax sale statutes do not have the protections that the Wyoming foreclosure statutes do. Sherman v. Rose (In re Sherman), 223 B.R. 555, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 1127 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 1998), reh'g denied, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 1265 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Oct. 9, 1998).

Notice of proceedings on confirmation. —

Where notice was given of intended sale, owner could not contend that it did not have notice of proceedings on confirmation which regularly followed under statute, especially where, on motion to vacate sale, it was not claimed that owner had been unavoidably prevented from receiving notice of sale. Grieve v. Huber, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1930).

Sufficiency of publication. —

Publication of notice of mortgage foreclosure sale weekly for four successive weeks was sufficient though less than 28 days elapsed between time of first publication and date of sale. Home Owners' Loan Corp. v. Diefenderfer, 57 Wyo. 13, 112 P.2d 563,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1941).

Designation of accounts as proceeds of auction sale as notice
to claimant. —

The designation of an account as proceeds of an auction sale, at the very least, put any claimant to the money on notice that the funds were not the unrestricted property of either the person who deposited them or of the person whose name was used to indicate the source from which they came. National Ass'n of Credit Men v. Moss, 349 P.2d 202,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916); In re Various Water Rights in Lake De Smet Reservoir, 623 P.2d 764,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1981); Cliff & Co. v. Anderson, 777 P.2d 595,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming Foreclosure Decrees — Personal Judgments and the Right to Jury Trial,” 4 Land & Water L. Rev. 227 (1969).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

For case note, “Real Estate — The Wyoming Installment Land Contract: A Mortgage in Sheep's Clothing? or What You See Isn't What You Get. Metropolitan Mortgage & Securities Co. v. Belgrade, 816 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 309 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes public sale, 4 ALR2d 575.

Execution and action on note or bond, not resulting in sale of mortgaged property, as precluding foreclosure of real estate mortgage, 37 ALR2d 959.

§ 1-18-102.
Certificate of purchase in lieu of deed; contents; recordation of
duplicate; admissibility.

When real property is
sold by virtue of an execution, order of sale, decree of foreclosure
or foreclosure by advertisement and sale, the sheriff or other officer,
instead of executing a deed to the premises sold, shall give to the
purchaser of the lands a certificate in writing describing the property
purchased and the sum paid therefor, or if purchased by the plaintiff
in execution or by the mortgagee, the amount of his bid. The certificate
shall state that the purchaser is entitled to a deed for the property
at the expiration of the period of redemption, unless the property
is redeemed prior to that date as provided by law. The sheriff or
other officer shall record in the office of the recorder of the county
a duplicate of the certificate, signed and acknowledged by him, and
the certificate or a certified copy thereof is admissible as evidence
of the facts therein contained.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3880; C.S. 1910, § 4734; C.S. 1920, § 6007; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 98; R.S. 1931, § 89-2966; C.S. 1945, § 3-4302; W.S. 1957, § 1-479; Laws 1971, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-102

.

Cross references. —

For provision that successor in office may execute certificate or deed, see §

1-17-329

.

Time of “sale.” —

The property was “sold” and the sale was “complete” on the date of the foreclosure sale. McCarn v. WYHY Fed. Credit Union (In re McCarn), 218 B.R. 154, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 282 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

Difference in language between certificate and section. —

In an action of unlawful detainer brought by purchasers more than six months after a foreclosure sale, where the certificate of sale stated the substance of this section, that is, that at the expiration of the period of redemption provided by statute the sheriff would give to the purchasers a deed conveying to them all title to the premises, the difference in language between the certificate and this section was of doubtful importance and, if it was error, was wholly immaterial in view of §

1-18-104

, which gives the purchaser the right to possession after the expiration of six (now three) months from the sale. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Effect of redemption on mortgage lien. —

After mortgagors redeemed the property after the mortgagee had foreclosed upon its mortgage, the mortgagors acquired the mortgagee's mortgage interest. At that point, the lien and the title to the property merged, and the mortgage ceased to exist. First Southwestern Fin. Servs. v. Laird, 882 P.2d 1211,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1994).

Redemption period. —

Because property sold by execution was not mortgaged, the redemption period under this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-18-103

was three months, regardless of whether the property was agricultural.
Cook v. Swires, 2009 WY 21, 202 P.3d 397,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Federal Land Bank v. Miller, 730 P.2d 122,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 647

(Wyo. 1986); Newman v. American Nat'l Bank, 780 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916); Christensen v. Oedekoven, 888 P.2d 228,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 1-18-103.
Right
of redemption; redemption of agricultural real estate; “agricultural
real estate” defined.

Except as provided with respect to agricultural real estate, it is lawful for any person, his heirs, executors, administrators, assigns or guarantors whose real property has been sold by virtue of an execution, decree of foreclosure, or foreclosure by advertisement and sale within three (3) months from the date of sale, to redeem the real estate by paying to the purchaser, his heirs, executors, administrators or assigns, or to the sheriff or other officer who sold the property, for the benefit of the purchaser, the amount of the purchase price or the amount given or bid if purchased by the execution creditor or by the mortgagee under a mortgage, together with interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum from the date of sale plus the amount of any assessments or taxes and the amount due on any prior lien which the purchaser paid after the purchase, with interest. On payment of this amount the sale and certificate granted are void and the sheriff or other officer shall issue a certificate of redemption.

In the case of any mortgage upon one (1) or more parcels of real estate any or all of which were agricultural real estate on the date of execution of the mortgage as stated in the mortgage, the period within which the owner, his heirs, executors, administrators, assigns or guarantors may redeem the premises sold is twelve (12) months from the date of the sale.

The term “agricultural real estate” means any single parcel of land in excess of eighty (80) acres lying outside the exterior boundaries of any incorporated city, town or recorded subdivision or any property that is used substantially for agricultural purposes, which, if combined with other property in the mortgage that is used substantially for agricultural purposes, equals eighty (80) acres or more in aggregate. If the mortgage recites that the real estate involved is agricultural real estate, it is presumed the parties to the mortgage, their heirs, executors, administrators, assigns, guarantors or successors in interest have agreed to and are bound by all the provisions of law relative to the twelve (12) month right of redemption provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3881; C.S. 1910, § 4735; C.S. 1920, § 6008; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 99; R.S. 1931, § 89-2967; C.S. 1945, § 3-4303; W.S. 1957, § 1-480; Laws 1971, ch. 79, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-103

; Laws 1979, ch. 49, § 1; 1983, ch. 24, § 1; 1986, ch. 16, § 1; 1988, ch. 61, § 1; 2008, ch. 12, § 1; 2009, ch. 62, § 1; 2019 ch. 183, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “eighty (80)” for “twenty (20)” in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), inserted “twelve (12) month” preceding “right of redemption” and added “provided in subsection (b) of this section” in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added “and the sheriff or other officer shall issue a certificate of redemption” to the end of the last sentence; and in (c), added “single” preceding “parcel” and “or any property that is used substantially for agricultural purposes, which, if combined with other property in the mortgage that is used substantially for agricultural purposes, equals eighty (80) acres or more in aggregate” in the first sentence.

Applicability of section. —

This section deals with sales which were valid and from which redemption is sought in due course and does not purport to deal with situation where sale was under a judgment which was a nullity. Elstermeyer v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 256, 116 P.2d 231,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1941), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 421, 120 P.2d 599,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1942).

Ownership unnecessary. —

Under this section, it is not necessary that defendant in execution be owner of the property at time of redemption to enable him to redeem. Altman v. Schuneman, 39 Wyo. 414, 273 P. 173,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1929).

Character of property determines applicable statutory provisions.
—

The character of the property and not its use determines the statutory provisions to be applied in ascertaining the redemption period. Evans v. Stamper, 835 P.2d 1145,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1992).

Avoidance of forfeiture. —

In contrast to the finality and harshness of forfeiture, the mortgagor in a mortgage transaction has a statutory right of redemption pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, which applies to foreclosure sales pursuant to judicial decree, execution, or power of sale. Sannerud v. Brantz, 928 P.2d 477,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1996).

Debtors failed to redeem. —

The debtors had three months to redeem the property from the credit union by paying the amount bid by the credit union at the foreclosure sale, plus interest and other charges. McCarn v. WYHY Fed. Credit Union (In re McCarn), 218 B.R. 154, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 282 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

Right of husband transferring homestead to redeem. —

Husband transferring property in homestead to wife after levy under execution is entitled to redeem, under this section, since as head of the family he has joint possessory right in homestead with the wife. Altman v. Schuneman, 39 Wyo. 414, 273 P. 173,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1929).

Right to redeem tenancy by entireties property. —

In property held as tenants by the entireties neither spouse possesses an independent interest in the property and neither spouse has an interest to which a federal tax lien could attach. Thus, the defaulting taxpayer husband whose tenancy by the entirety property was foreclosed upon had no separate and distinct interest in the right to redeem, but the right to redeem is in the husband and wife, as tenants by the entirety. Talbot v. United States, 850 F. Supp. 969, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5939 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Remedy of mortgagor. —

Mortgagor could prosecute an action to set aside sale and enjoin issuance of certificate of sale and deed instead of bringing a “legal” action. Peterson v. Johnson, 46 Wyo. 473, 28 P.2d 487,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1934).

No right to have deed declared mortgage. —

Mortgagors not repurchasing property within contract time are not entitled to have deed, made to avoid foreclosure, declared mortgage in action brought just before time expired. Ditto v. Bank of Gillette, 38 Wyo. 120, 264 P. 1013,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1928).

When mortgagor acquires equitable interest of senior mortgagee

before it ripens into legal ownership of the property, such interest merges with the mortgagor's legal title, and the senior mortgage ceases to exist. Such is equivalent to a redemption under subsection (a), and liens of junior mortgagees are validated. Newman v. American Nat'l Bank, 780 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1989).

Redeemer must pay in money or equivalent. —

The phrase “to redeem the real estate by paying to the purchaser … the amount of the purchase price” in the first sentence of subsection (a) means that the redeemer must pay in money or its equivalent. Albrecht v. Zwaanshoek Holding En Financiering, B.V., 816 P.2d 808,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. Sept. 25, 1991).

Creditor's retention of pledged stock not “payment.” —

A creditor's retention of stock pledged as security on a promissory note, after satisfying a judgment on the note by foreclosing on a ranch which also secured the note, did not constitute “payment” under this section. Albrecht v. Zwaanshoek Holding En Financiering, B.V., 816 P.2d 808,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. Sept. 25, 1991).

Redemptioner paid for unreceived, unredeemable land. —

Judgment creditors already had title to a parcel of land by virtue of a prior recorded warranty deed and their ownership interest was not affected by their execution against this land. The redemptioner, however, had paid something to redeem this land, as to which he had no right of redemption and to which the court subsequently quieted title in the judgment creditors. Under the circumstances, to refuse to permit the complaint to be amended so that the redemptioner could claim the amount paid for the parcel which he did not receive constituted an abuse of discretion. Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Ferguson Ranch, Inc. v. Murray, 811 P.2d 287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1991).

Deficiency judgment allowed. —

Deficiency judgments after foreclosure by advertisement and sale, on deeds of trust or purchase money mortgages, are allowed when the foreclosure and sale was proper and equitable. Fitch v. Buffalo Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 751 P.2d 1309,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1988).

Effect of redemption on mortgage lien. —

After mortgagors redeemed the property after the mortgagee had foreclosed upon its mortgage, the mortgagors acquired the mortgagee's mortgage interest. At that point, the lien and the title to the property merged, and the mortgage ceased to exist. First Southwestern Fin. Servs. v. Laird, 882 P.2d 1211,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1994).

Effect of redemption on pre-foreclosure quitclaim deed. —

Where father quitclaimed property to three-year old son that was subsequently foreclosed upon by the IRS, monies supplied by the son's uncle to the father for redemption in exchange for father's quitclaim deed to uncle gave the uncle an equitable lien upon the property, but title to the property reverted to the property's presale status and thus to the son. Jessen v. Jessen, 2002 WY 33, 41 P.3d 543,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. Apr. 9, 2002).

Redemption period. —

Because property sold by execution was not mortgaged, the redemption period under this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-18-102

was three months, regardless of whether the property was agricultural.
Cook v. Swires, 2009 WY 21, 202 P.3d 397,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Gladstone Hotel, Inc. v. Smith, 487 P.2d 329,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1971); Amen, Inc. v. Barnard, 938 P.2d 855,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1997); McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Federal Land Bank v. Miller, 730 P.2d 122,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 647

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1950).

Cited

in

Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

, 40 L.R.A. (n.s.) 785 (1912); Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916); In re Dickinson, 9 F. Supp. 227, 1934 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1197 (D. Wyo. 1934); Marple v. Wyoming Prod. Credit Ass'n, 750 P.2d 1315,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1988); Cliff & Co. v. Anderson, 777 P.2d 595,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1989); Gantz v. Colonial Cent. Sav. Bank, F.S.B. (In re Gantz), 162 B.R. 890, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 316 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Effect of Satisfying a Junior Lien on Statutory Right of Redemption,” 15 Wyo. L.J. 223.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

For case note, “Real Estate — The Wyoming Installment Land Contract: A Mortgage in Sheep's Clothing? or What You See Isn't What You Get. Metropolitan Mortgage & Securities Co. v. Belgrade, 816 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 309 (1993).

For case note, “Real Property—Intent of the Parties—The Focal Point of Interpreting the Installment Land Contract. McKone v. Guertzgen, 811 P.2d 728,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 329 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Redemption of client's property sold at execution or judicial sale to attorney, 20 ALR2d 1280.

Sufficiency of tender of payment to effect defaulting vendee's redemption of rights in land purchased, 37 ALR4th 286.

Constitutionality, construction and application of statute as to effect of taking appeal, or staying execution, on right to redeem from execution or judicial sale, 44 ALR4th 1229.

Mortgages: effect on subordinate lien of redemption by owner or assignee from sale under prior lien, 56 ALR4th 703.

§ 1-18-104.
Redemption
by judgment creditors and others; manner prescribed; subsequent redemptions;
possession, rents and profits, common carriers excepted.

If no redemption is made within the redemption period provided in W.S.

1-18-103

, any judgment creditor of the person whose real estate has been sold, or any grantee or mortgagee of the real estate or person holding a lien on the real estate sold is entitled to redeem the same on or before the thirtieth day after the expiration of the applicable redemption period provided in W.S.

1-18-103

, by complying with subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The redemptioner shall pay to the purchaser or to the officer conducting the sale, either an amount agreed upon by the purchaser and the redemptioner, or the amount bid with interest at ten percent (10%) per annum from the date of sale, and the amount of any assessments or taxes and the amount due on any prior lien which the purchaser may have paid after the purchase, with interest. If the purchaser also has a lien prior to that of the redemptioner, the redemptioner shall also pay the amount of the lien with interest.

The redemptioner must produce for the purchaser from whom redemption is sought or for the officer who conducted the sale:

A copy of the judgment under which the right of redemption is claimed, duly certified by the clerk of the court in which the judgment was entered, or if redemption is sought under a mortgage or other lien, a copy of the mortgage or other lien certified by the clerk of the county; or

A copy of any assignment necessary to establish the claim; and

An affidavit by himself or his agent showing the amount actually unpaid and due on the lien.

If the property is redeemed, another redemptioner may within thirty (30) days from the last redemption again redeem from the last redemptioner by paying the amount of the last redemption together with interest at ten percent (10%) per annum from the date thereof, and the amount of any assessment or taxes which the last redemptioner may have paid and the amount of any lien held by the last redemptioner prior to his own, with interest. The property may again, and as often as any redemptioner desires, be redeemed from any previous redemption within thirty (30) days from the last redemption. If no redemption is made within thirty (30) days after the applicable redemption period provided in W.S.

1-18-103

, the purchaser or his assignee is entitled to a sheriff’s deed to the property, or if so redeemed, whenever thirty (30) days has elapsed and no other redemption has been made, the last redemptioner or his assignee is entitled to a sheriff’s deed.

The execution debtor in case of a sale on execution, and the mortgagor or owner in case of a mortgage foreclosure, is entitled to possession of the lands sold and to the rents and profits for a period of three (3) months after the sale unless the property is agricultural property in which case the entitlement to possession of the lands sold and to the rents and profits shall be for a period of twelve (12) months after the sale. At the expiration of three (3) months from sale of nonagricultural land and twelve (12) months from sale of agricultural land, the purchaser is entitled to possession and to the rents and profits of the lands until redemption is made from him, and each redemptioner until another redemption is made is likewise entitled to possession and to the rents and profits.

The parties to a mortgage may provide that the mortgagee is entitled to a receiver or to the rents and profits upon default, or upon the date of sale or at any time agreed upon. A court may appoint a receiver or award the rents and profits to the person entitled thereto for the prevention of waste, or the preservation of the property, or for any equitable cause.

This section does not apply when real and personal property of a common carrier is sold in its entirety at a judicial sale pursuant to an order of court. In such case, property may be sold without right of redemption unless otherwise directed by the order of sale.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3882; C.S. 1910, § 4736; C.S. 1920, § 6009; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 100; R.S. 1931, § 89-2968; C.S. 1945, § 3-4304; W.S. 1957, § 1-481; Laws 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 79, § 3; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-104

; 2011, ch. 173, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to contents of deed, see §

1-18-109

.

As to effect of deed, see §

1-18-110

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), inserted “either an amount agreed upon by the purchaser and the redemptioner, or”; and in (e), inserted “unless the property is agricultural property in which case the entitlement to possession of the lands sold and to the rents and profits shall be for a period of twelve (12) months after the sale” and “of nonagricultural land and twelve (12) months from sale of agricultural land.”

Only judgment creditor of partnership redeems property. —

When property which is held in a partnership's name is sold at a foreclosure sale, the partnership, not an individual partner, is the “person whose real estate has been sold.” Under the plain language of this section, only a judgment creditor of the partnership can redeem the property. Christensen v. Oedekoven, 888 P.2d 228,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1995).

Rights of mortgagee. —

Although an individual purchases a mortgage because he thinks it will give him a right to be in the building as mortgagee, he has no such right. The mortgage simply creates a lien on the land, and title to the mortgaged property does not pass to him as mortgagee even on default, but passes only on sale by foreclosure. International Distress Signals v. McDowell, 519 P.2d 224,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1974).

Where the mortgage provision, entitling the mortgagee to rents and profits when the right of foreclosure accrued, was not self-executing, the mortgagee's right to receive rents and profits from the mortgaged property prior to taking possession would not accrue until it took some affirmative action to exercise that right. Landen v. Production Credit Ass'n, 737 P.2d 1325,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1987).

Time for issuing sheriff's deed. —

Under this section, creditors may redeem after the expiration of six (now three) months and at any time before the expiration of nine months from the date of the sale (now 30 days after applicable redemption period), and this section contemplates that a sheriff's deed may be issued after the expiration of nine months (now 30 days after applicable redemption period). Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Right of purchaser to maintain action for unlawful detainer.
—

Under this section, which provides that the purchaser is entitled to possession after the expiration of six (now three) months from the sale, a purchaser at a foreclosure sale may maintain an action of unlawful detainer after the expiration of the six (now three) months period, and the fact that a sheriff's deed for the premises was prematurely issued and error, if any, in that the language of the certificate of sale differs from the language of §

1-18-102

, are immaterial. Ferguson v. Haygood, 67 Wyo. 422, 225 P.2d 336,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1950).

Action to quiet title. —

A husband bought property for a homestead and he and his wife mortgaged it for purchase money, and upon this mortgage being foreclosed and property sold, they borrowed money from grantor to redeem, giving as security a mortgage wherein the wife alone expressly waived her homestead rights, but property was later again sold at foreclosure sale under this mortgage and a certificate of sale issued, held, that last-mentioned purchaser acquired lien, equal to that of first mortgage and superior to homestead rights of the wife, and wife, not having paid or offered to pay at least amount necessary to satisfy the prior lien could not prevail in suit to quiet her title as against such purchaser. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912).

Character of property determines applicable statutory provisions.
—

The character of the property and not its use determines the statutory provisions to be applied in ascertaining the redemption period. Evans v. Stamper, 835 P.2d 1145,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

Amen, Inc. v. Barnard, 938 P.2d 855,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1997); McNeill Family Trust v. Centura Bank, 2003 WY 2, 60 P.3d 1277,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Federal Land Bank v. Miller, 730 P.2d 122,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 647

(Wyo. 1986); Newman v. American Nat'l Bank, 780 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916); In re Wogstad, 14 F. Supp. 72, 1936 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1263 (D. Wyo. 1936); Marple v. Wyoming Prod. Credit Ass'n, 750 P.2d 1315,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What judgment creditor other than execution sale creditor may redeem from execution sale, 58 ALR2d 467.

Mortgages: effect on subordinate lien of redemption by owner or assignee from sale under prior lien, 56 ALR4th 703.

§ 1-18-105.
Redemption of whole or portion permitted.

Any person entitled may
redeem the whole or any part or portion of lands previously sold upon
execution or by foreclosure, but such redemption must be made in the
distinct quantities or parcels in which they were sold.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 3885; C.S. 1910, § 4739; C.S. 1920, § 6012; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 101; R.S. 1931, § 89-2969; C.S. 1945, § 3-4305; W.S. 1957, § 1-482; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-105

.

§ 1-18-106.
Certificate of redemption; recordation; fee.

In all cases of redemption
of lands from sale under any judicial process, or by virtue of any
mortgage foreclosure, the purchaser or other person from whom the
redemption is made shall certify the redemption in writing and record
the certificate in the recorder’s office of the proper county as other
writings affecting the titles to real estate are filed and recorded.
The recording fee shall be paid by the party redeeming.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 3890; C.S. 1910, § 4744; C.S. 1920, § 6017; R.S. 1931, § 89-2975; C.S. 1945, § 3-4310; W.S. 1957, § 1-483; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-106

.

§ 1-18-107.
Commission of officers.

No commission upon the
amount of the redemption money paid shall be allowed to the officer
receiving the money, but the usual commission shall be allowed the
officer selling the premises, on the excess made over and above the
amount of the redemption money and interest.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3886; C.S. 1910, § 4740; C.S. 1920, § 6013; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 102; R.S. 1931, § 89-2970; C.S. 1945, § 3-4306; W.S. 1957, § 1-484; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-107

.

§ 1-18-108.
Assignment of certificate of purchase.

Every certificate given
by any officer to any purchaser under W.S.

1-18-101

through

1-18-110

, is assignable by endorsement under the hand of the purchaser,
his heirs, executor, administrator or assignee. Every person to whom
the certificate is assigned is entitled to the same benefits therefrom
in every respect that the person named would have been if the certificate
had not been assigned, including a deed if the property is not redeemed
as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3887; C.S. 1910, § 4741; C.S. 1920, § 6014; R.S. 1931, § 89-2971; C.S. 1945, § 3-4307; W.S. 1957, § 1-485; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-19-108

.

Quoted

in

Newman v. American Nat'l Bank, 780 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

, 40 L.R.A. (n.s.) 785 (1912).

§ 1-18-109.
Contents of deed; form.

The deed to be executed
by the officer to the purchaser under W.S.

1-18-101

through

1-18-110

shall contain a statement of the judgment upon which
the lands described were sold, and the date of the execution in the
case of an execution sale; a statement of the mortgage, with its date
and place of record, the parties thereto, and a statement of the decree
in case of foreclosure by suit; or a statement of the time and place
of sale in the case of a foreclosure by advertisement and sale. The
deed shall also contain a recital showing the issuance of a certificate
of purchase and any assignment of the certificate that has been made.
The deed shall also contain substantially the following words:

Now, therefore, know
all men by this deed, that I,
. . . . . , of the county of
. . . . .
in consideration
of the premises, have granted and sold and do hereby convey to
. . . . . , his heirs and assigns, the following
described tract of land,
. . . . . ,
to have and to hold the described premises with all appurtenances
to the said
. . . . . , his heirs and
assigns forever.

Witness my hand and seal
this
. . . . .
day of
. . . . . , A.D.
. . . . .

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, §§ 9, 10; R.S. 1899, § 3888; C.S. 1910, § 4742; C.S. 1920, § 6015; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 103; R.S. 1931, § 89-2972; C.S. 1945, § 3-4308; W.S. 1957, § 1-486; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-19-109.

Cross references. —

For provision that successor in office may execute deed, see §

1-17-329

.

Cited

in

Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

, 40 L.R.A. (n.s.) 785 (1912).

§ 1-18-110.
Effect of deed.

Any deed so executed
is prima facie evidence that the provisions of law in relation to
sale of real property upon execution, or upon foreclosure, were complied
with. The deed conveys to the grantee all the title, estate and interest
of defendant in the execution, or the mortgagor or owner, in the lands
thereby conveyed, but the deed shall not be construed to contain any
covenant upon the part of the officer executing the same.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 95, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 3889; C.S. 1910, § 4743; C.S. 1920, § 6016; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 104; R.S. 1931, § 89-2974; C.S. 1945, § 3-4309; W.S. 1957, § 1-487; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-19-110.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning effect of deed, see §

1-17-324

.

Cited

in

In re McCarn, 218 B.R. 154, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 282 (10th Cir. 1998).

§ 1-18-111.
Sale on foreclosure of mortgage; generally.

When a mortgage is foreclosed a sale of the premises shall be ordered. The decree directing the sale is sufficient warrant for the sheriff or other officer to proceed to advertise and conduct the sale. An order of sale issued by the clerk of court or an appraisement of the real property to be sold is not necessary. When the premises to be sold are in one (1) or more tracts, the court may direct the officer who makes the sale to subdivide and sell the same in parcels, or to sell any one (1) of the tracts as a whole.

Upon the sale of the premises, a purchaser shall have a limited right of entry to ensure the property does not significantly deteriorate during the full redemption period. As used in this subsection, “limited right of entry” means entrance into the premises which is not occupied by a legal inhabitant.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 323; R.S. 1887, § 2663; R.S. 1899, § 3757; C.S. 1910, § 4612; C.S. 1920, § 5883; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 91; R.S. 1931, § 89-2209; C.S. 1945, § 3-3507; W.S. 1957, § 1-488; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-19-111; 2019 ch. 183, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).

Nature of judgment. —

Whereby contract of sale of land and buyers' deed back to seller, absolute title remained in seller, the latter, foreclosing his lien against the buyers in default, is not entitled to a personal or deficiency judgment. Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1916).

Quoted

in

Federal Land Bank v. Miller, 730 P.2d 122,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 647

(Wyo. 1986).